Maryland, session 2026, SB0025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0025*

SENATE BILL 25
Article – Tax – General
10–733.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Cybersecurity business” means an entity organized for profit that is
engaged primarily in the development of innovative and proprietary cybersecurity
technology or the provision of cybersecurity service.
(3) “Cybersecurity service” means an activity that is associated with a
category or subcategory identified under the Framework Core established by the National
Institute of Standards and Technology’s Cybersecurity Framework.
(4) “Cybersecurity technology” means products or goods intended to detect
or prevent activity intended to result in unauthorized access to, exfiltration of,
manipulation of, or impairment to the integrity, confidentiality, or availability of an
information system or information stored on or transiting an information system.
(5) “Department” means the Department of Commerce.
(6) [“Panel” means the panel that the Department may establish under
subsection (c) of this section composed of experts in the areas of cybersecurity technology
and cybersecurity service.
(7)] “Qualified buyer” means any entity [that has fewer than 50 employees
in the State and] that is required to file an income tax return in the State.
[(8)] (7) “Qualified seller” means a cybersecurity business that:
(i) has its headquarters and base of operations in the State;
(ii) 1. has less than [$5,000,000] $10,000,000 in annual
revenue;
2. IS OWNED BY AN INDIVIDUAL OR GROUP OF
INDIVIDUALS WHO BELONG TO A GROUP THAT HISTORICALLY HAS BEEN DEPRIVED
OF ACCESS TO NORMAL ECONOMIC OR FINANCIAL RESOURCES;
3. is a [minority–owned, woman–owned,] veteran–owned[,]
or service–disabled–veteran–owned business; or
[3.] 4. is located in a historically underutilized business
zone designated by the United States Small Business Administration;

SENATE BILL 25 3
(iii) 1. owns or has properly licensed any proprietary
cybersecurity technology; or
2. provides a cybersecurity service;
(iv) is in good standing;
(v) is current in the payment of all tax obligations to the State or any
unit or subdivision of the State; and
(vi) is not in default under the terms of any contract with,
indebtedness to, or grant from the State or any unit or subdivision of the State.
(b) (1) THERE IS A BUY MARYLAND CYBERSECURITY TAX CREDIT
ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE BUY MARYLAND CYBERSECURITY TAX CREDIT IS INTENDED
TO PROMOTE THE CYBERSECURITY INDUSTRY IN THE STATE BY HELPING
MARYLAND BUSINESSES AND NONPROFITS PURCHASE CYBERSECURITY
TECHNOLOGIES AND SERVICES FROM MARYLAND CYBERSECURITY COMPANIES TO
PROTECT BUSINESS AND CUSTOMER INFORMATION.
[(1)] (3) Subject to paragraphs [(2) and (3)] (4) THROUGH (6) of this
subsection, a qualified buyer may claim a credit against the State income tax in an amount
equal to 50% of the cost incurred during the taxable year to purchase cybersecurity
technology or a cybersecurity service from one or more qualified sellers.
[(2)] (4) For any taxable year, the credit allowed under this section may
not exceed $50,000 for each qualified buyer.
(5) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IN ANY TAXABLE
YEAR EXCEEDS THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR, A QUALIFIED
BUYER MAY CLAIM A REFUND IN THE AMOUNT OF THE EXCESS.
[(3)] (6) For any taxable year, the aggregate credits claimed for
cybersecurity technology or cybersecurity service purchased from a single qualified seller
may not exceed [$200,000] $1,000,000.
(c) [(1) The Department, in consultation with the Maryland Technology
Development Corporation, may establish a panel composed of experts in the areas of
cybersecurity technology and cybersecurity service.
(2) The Department may establish the panel under service contracts with
independent reviewers.

SENATE BILL 25
(3) The panel shall assist the Department in its determination as to
whether a company is a qualified seller.
(4) A member of the panel is not eligible to receive any benefit, direct or
indirect, from the tax credit under this section.
(5) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
Division II of the State Finance and Procurement Article does not apply to a service that
the Department obtains under this section.
(ii) The Department is subject to Title 12, Subtitle 4 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article for services the Department obtains under this section.]
[(d)] (1) (i) A qualified buyer eligible for the credit under this section may
apply to the Department for a credit certificate that states the amount of the credit the
qualified buyer may claim under subsection (b) of this section.
(ii) A qualified buyer shall attach the credit certificate to the income
tax return on which the qualified buyer claims the credit under subsection (b) of this
section.
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the Secretary of Commerce
shall approve each application under paragraph (1) of this subsection that qualifies for a
credit certificate.
(3) [(i)] The total amount of the credit certificates approved by the
Secretary of Commerce under this subsection may not exceed:
[1.] (I) for taxable year 2018, $2,000,000; and
[2.] (II) for taxable year 2019 and each taxable year
thereafter, $4,000,000.
[(ii) For each taxable year, the Secretary of Commerce shall award
25% of the amount of tax credits authorized under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph to
qualified buyers that purchase cybersecurity services.]
[(e)] (D) (1) The Department may revoke its certification of a credit under
this section if any representation made in connection with the application for the
certification is determined by the Department to have been false.
(2) The revocation may be in full or in part as the Department may
determine and, subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, shall be communicated to the
qualified buyer and the Comptroller.

SENATE BILL 25 5
(3) The qualified buyer shall have an opportunity to appeal any revocation
to the Department before notification of the Comptroller.
(4) The Comptroller may make an assessment against the qualified buyer
to recapture any amount of tax credit that the qualified buyer has already claimed.
[(f)] (E) In accordance with § 2.5–109 of the Economic Development Article, the
Department shall submit a report on the credit certificates awarded under this section for
the calendar year.
[(g)] (F) The Department and the Comptroller jointly shall adopt regulations to
carry out this section and to specify criteria and procedures for application for, approval of,
and monitoring continuing eligibility for the tax credit under this section.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT APPROVE A CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION
FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2030.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.